Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Wild Rivers System

146.200.
Title.

KRS 146.200 to 146.360 may be cited as the “Kentucky Wild Rivers Act.”

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 1.

146.210.
Definitions used in KRS 146.210 to 146.360.

As used in KRS 146.210 to 146.360, the words listed herein shall have the following respective meanings, unless another or different meaning or intent shall be clearly indicated by the context:

“Stream or watercourse” shall mean a flowing body of water or a section or portion thereof, including rivers, streams, and creeks.

“Free flowing” shall mean existing or flowing in a natural condition without impoundment, diversion, straightening, riprapping, or other modification of the waterway. The existence, however, of low dams, diversion works, and other minor structures at the time any stream is proposed for inclusion in the Wild Rivers System shall not automatically bar its consideration for such inclusion; provided, that this shall not be construed to authorize or to be intended to encourage future construction of such structures within components of the Wild Rivers System.

“Road” shall mean a highway, a hard-surfaced road, or an improved or unimproved dirt road. The existence, however, of unimproved roads at the time any stream is proposed for inclusion in the Wild Rivers System shall not automatically bar its consideration for such inclusion; provided, that this shall not be construed to authorize or to be intended to encourage future construction of such roads where this would be contrary to the provisions of KRS 146.200 to 146.360.

“Wilderness type recreation” shall mean activities such as fishing, hunting, canoeing, camping, hiking, horseback riding, exploring, archaeological and scientific investigation, and scenic and aesthetic enjoyment, which utilizes and protects to the highest degree the primitive and natural values of the area.

“Visual horizon” shall mean the normal distance to which land and vegetative features can be unobstructedly viewed from the center of the stream.

“Access point” shall mean an area along the stream under public ownership, or under easement acquired by agreement with a private landowner. This area would be available for public recreational use including, but not limited to, the launching of boats, picnicking, and camping.

“Secretary” shall mean the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet or the successor to that office.

“Office” shall mean the Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9); 1976, ch. 197, § 1; 2010, ch. 24, § 123, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 117, § 5, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 29, § 10, effective July 14, 2018.

146.220.
Legislative intent.

The General Assembly hereby recognizes that certain streams of Kentucky possess outstanding and unique scenic, recreational, geological, fish and wildlife, botanical, historical, archaeological and other scientific, aesthetic, and cultural values. It is the policy of the General Assembly to complement dam construction and development projects on Kentucky watercourses with other equally important and beneficial uses of our water resources. Therefore, it is hereby declared that in order to afford the citizens of the Commonwealth an opportunity to enjoy natural streams, to attract out-of-state visitors, to assure the well-being of our tourist industry, to preserve for future generations the beauty of certain areas untrammeled by man, it is in the interest of the Commonwealth to preserve some streams or portions thereof in their free-flowing condition because their natural, scenic, scientific, and aesthetic values outweigh their value for water development and control purposes now and in the future. For aesthetic, as well as ecological reasons, the foremost priority shall be to preserve the unique primitive character of those streams in Kentucky which still retain a large portion of their natural and scenic beauty, and to prevent future infringement on that beauty by impoundments or other man-made works. Since the stream areas are to be maintained in a natural state, they will also serve as areas for the perpetuation of Kentucky’s wild fauna and flora. Few such streams remain in the Eastern portion of the United States, and the General Assembly feels a strong obligation to the people of Kentucky to preserve these remnants of their proud heritage. It is the purpose of KRS 146.200 to 146.360 to establish a Wild Rivers System by designating certain streams for immediate inclusion in the system and by prescribing the procedures and criteria for protecting and administering the system. It is not the intent of KRS 146.200 to 146.360 to require or to authorize acquisition of all lands or interests in lands within the boundaries of the stream areas but to assure preservation of the scenic, ecological and other values and to provide proper management of the recreational, wildlife, water and other resources. It is the intent of KRS 146.200 to 146.360 to impose reasonable regulations as to the use of private and public land within the authorized boundaries of wild rivers for the general welfare of the people of the Commonwealth, and where necessary, to enable the department to acquire easements or lesser interests in or fee title to lands within the authorized boundaries of the wild rivers, so that the public trust in these unique natural rivers might be kept.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 3; 1976, ch. 197, § 2.

146.230.
Criteria for streams in Wild Rivers System.

Streams which substantially meet the following criteria are eligible for inclusion in the Wild Rivers System: Streams or sections of streams that are essentially free-flowing, with shorelines and scenic vistas essentially primitive and unchanged, free from evidence of the works of man, and pleasing to the eye. The waters shall not be polluted beyond feasible correction and shall be kept unpolluted once corrected according to standards established by the Energy and Environment Cabinet through the Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves. The area may provide a high quality fish and wildlife habitat, containing one or more unique or rare species for sport or observation. It may provide opportunities for scientific study or appreciation of essentially undisturbed ecological, geologic, or archaeologic conditions. It shall provide wilderness type recreation such as canoeing and hiking, or specialized uses without disturbing the primitive character of the area.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 4; 1976, ch. 197, § 3; 2010, ch. 24, § 124, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 29, § 11, effective July 14, 2018.

146.240.
Designation of streams in Wild Rivers System. [Repealed.]

146.241.
Designation of streams in Wild Rivers System.

The streams or segments of streams to be included in this system, being classified by KRS 146.230, are as follows:

The Cumberland River from Summer Shoals to the backwater of Lake Cumberland;

The Red River from the Ky. 746 bridge to the mouth of Swift Camp Creek. Nothing in KRS 146.220 to 146.360 shall be construed to prohibit that portion of the Red River between Peck’s Branch and Swift Camp Creek from being used to temporarily contain flood waters that may be impounded above the normal sustained pool level of any lake which may be created in the event a dam is constructed on the Red River near Bowen, Kentucky;

The Rockcastle River from the Ky. 80 bridge to the backwater of Lake Cumberland. Nothing in KRS 146.220 to 146.360 shall be construed to prohibit or interfere with the relocating of Ky. 80, including the construction of a bridge at a point approximately 2.35 miles downstream from the existing Ky. 80 bridge;

The Green River from the eastern boundary of Mammoth Cave National Park extending downstream and including only that portion of the river within the Mammoth Cave National Park;

The Big South Fork of the Cumberland River from the Tennessee border to Blue Herron;

Martins Fork, Cumberland River from Ky. Highway 987 bridge to the eastern boundary of Cumberland Gap National Park;

Rock Creek from the White Oak Junction bridge to the Kentucky-Tennessee border;

Little South Fork, Cumberland River from the backwater of Lake Cumberland (mile 4.1) to the Kentucky Highway 92 bridge (mile 14.5) in Wayne and McCreary counties; and

Bad Branch of Poor Fork, Cumberland River from the headwaters on Pine Mountain to the Ky. 932 bridge, including the entire watershed drained by all stream segments, except for that portion above a point 0.1 mile below the existing lake on the easternmost fork.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 197, § 4; 1986, ch. 326, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

146.250.
Boundaries of stream areas.

The boundaries of a stream area associated with a stream or stream segment included in the Wild Rivers System by KRS 146.200 to 146.360 shall include at least the visual horizon from the stream, but not more than two thousand (2,000) feet from the center of the stream. The boundary shall further include access points, at the upstream and downstream boundary of the area.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9); 1976, ch. 197, § 5; 2010, ch. 24, § 125, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 29, § 12, effective July 14, 2018.

146.260.
Recommendation of additional stream areas by Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves — Contents.

The office shall study and from time to time submit to the Governor and to the General Assembly proposals for additions to the Wild Rivers System of streams and sections of streams that qualify for inclusion therein. Each proposal shall be accompanied by:

A detailed map showing the boundaries of the stream or sections of streams and those adjacent lands needed to protect and administer the needed controls.

The category of the proposed additions in accordance with KRS 146.230.

A detailed report on the factors which make the area a worthy addition to the system.

The intention of this requirement is to insure that such studies will be made; it is not intended to preclude or discourage, but rather encourage similar studies and proposals by other agencies or by citizen groups working independently. Authority for additions to the Wild Rivers System shall remain exclusively with the Kentucky General Assembly.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 7; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9); 2010, ch. 24, § 126, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 29, § 13, effective July 14, 2018.

146.270.
Administration of system by Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves — Administrative regulations — Management plan.

The Wild Rivers System shall be administered by the Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves according to the policies and criteria set forth in KRS 146.200 to 146.360. The cabinet upon recommendation of the office shall adopt rules or promulgate administrative regulations necessary for the preservation and enhancement of the stream areas as set forth in KRS 146.250, and for control of recreational, educational, scientific, and other uses of these areas in a manner that shall not impair them. In administration primary emphasis shall be given to protecting aesthetic, scenic, historic, archaeologic, and scientific features of the area. The office shall develop a management plan for a designated stream area and shall publicize and hold public hearings and record the views expressed on each plan developed. Management plans for a given stream area may establish varying degrees of intensity for its protection, based on special attributes of each area, but shall follow the concepts embodied in KRS 146.230. No public use of lands within the boundaries of a designated wild river area in which the state has acquired an interest shall be permitted prior to the development of a management plan.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 8; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(1), (9); 1976, ch. 197, § 7; 2010, ch. 24, § 127, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 117, § 6, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 29, § 14, effective July 14, 2018.

146.280.
Acquisition of stream areas.

Within the boundaries of a designated stream area, as established and authorized by the Kentucky General Assembly, the office shall be authorized and empowered to acquire by purchase, exercise of the rights of eminent domain, grant, gift, devise, or otherwise, the fee simple title, an easement, or any acceptable lesser interest in any lands, and by lease or conveyance, contract for the right to use and occupy any lands. Where property within such boundaries is owned by the federal government, the office can enter into agreements with the landowning agency concerning use of the property consistent with the objectives of KRS 146.200 to 146.360. Nothing in KRS 146.200 to 146.360 shall be construed to deprive a landowner of the fee simple title to or lesser interest in his property without just compensation.

The office may not exercise authority to acquire lands or interests in lands located within any incorporated city or county when such entities have in force a duly adopted, valid ordinance or plan for the management, zoning and protection of such lands in accordance with the provisions of KRS 146.200 to 146.360.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9); 1976, ch. 197, § 8; 2010, ch. 24, § 128, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 117, § 7, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 29, § 15, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 44, § 24, effective June 27, 2019.

146.290.
Land uses permitted in stream area — Charge of use.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to those uses existing at such time as a stream is included in the system.

Land uses to be allowed within the boundaries of a designated stream area shall be as follows:

Any landowner within the boundaries of the area may apply to the office for a change of use to permit the select cutting of timber, a resource removal or an agricultural use upon his property located within the area. The office shall provide public notice within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the permit application, and the landowner or any interested person may, within thirty (30) days of the public notice, request a public hearing and provide any evidence or information as to whether the proposed use by the applying landowner is in accordance with the management plan developed pursuant to KRS 146.270, the purpose and intent of the Wild Rivers Act as expressed in KRS 146.220, and other applicable law.

The office shall, within thirty (30) days of the close of the comment period, or public hearing, if one is requested, either:

Issue an order, with accompanying opinion, denying the permit; or

Issue an order, with accompanying opinion, granting the permit with such restrictions, terms and conditions as are appropriate to protect to the fullest extent possible the wild rivers area and the public trust therein within the intent of KRS 146.220; or

Recommend an alternate use to which the land may be put under KRS 146.200 to 146.360 which is more consistent with the purposes and intent of KRS 146.200 to 146.360 than the use for which application was made; or

Institute condemnation proceedings in the circuit court of the county in which the land is located or else negotiate a purchase of the land affected, or any interest therein.

On or before thirty (30) days from the date of the office’s determination, the landowner may file with the office a written objection to the determination. If, within the next sixty (60) days the landowner and the secretary are unable to reach an agreement with respect to a modification of the determination, the office must either permit the use applied for, condemn the property, or petition the Franklin Circuit Court for an order restraining the proposed use. The order shall be entered immediately upon the filing of the petition and the execution of a bond without surety by the Commonwealth in an amount satisfactory to the court to indemnify the landowner against loss of profits from any wrongful restraint of the use of his property during the period from the filing of the petition until such time as the matter is concluded by the courts. The court shall review the decision as to both law and fact; but no factual finding shall be reversed unless clearly erroneous or else arbitrary, capricious, or an abuse of discretion.

New roads, structures or buildings may be constructed only where necessary to effect a use permitted under the other provisions of KRS 146.200 to 146.360. Utility lines or pipelines may be constructed as approved by the office in writing and under provision that the affected land be restored as nearly as possible to its former state. This provision, however, shall in no way affect the rights between a landowner and a utility company or pipeline company. There shall be no strip mining as defined in KRS 350.010, and select cutting of timber or other resource removal and agricultural use, may be allowed pursuant to regulations promulgated by the secretary upon the granting of a permit under the other provisions of KRS 146.200 to 146.360. All instream disturbances such as dredging, shall be prohibited. Except for the management agency and any existing uses which do not conform to the purposes and intent of KRS 146.200 to 146.360, travel upon a wild river or any public lands within the designated boundaries thereof, shall be by foot, horseback, canoe, boat or other nonmechanical modes of transportation. If there are existing agricultural areas within the boundaries of the area, such areas may continue to be used for agricultural purposes.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 10; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9); 1976, ch. 197, § 9; 2018 ch. 29, § 16, effective July 14, 2018.

146.300.
Determination of applicable law in conflict.

Any component of the Wild Rivers System that is or shall become a part of any state park, wildlife refuge, or similar state-administered area shall be subject to the provisions of KRS 146.200 to 146.360 and the laws under which the other areas may be administered, and in the case of conflict between the provisions of these laws the more restrictive provisions shall apply.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 11.

146.310.
State agencies to office of activities affecting stream areas.

All state agencies shall promptly inform the office of any proceedings, studies, or other activities within their jurisdictions, and regardless of by whom requested, which are now in progress and which affect or may affect any of the streams specified in KRS 146.241. They shall likewise inform the office of any such proceedings, studies or other activities that are hereafter commenced or resumed before they are commenced or resumed.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 12; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9); 1980, ch. 188, § 107, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 129, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 29, § 17, effective July 14, 2018.

146.320.
Component of Wild Rivers System may be included in federal system.

Nothing in KRS 146.200 to 146.360 shall preclude a component of the Wild Rivers System from becoming a part of the National Wild and Scenic Rivers System. The office shall be directed to encourage and assist any federal studies for inclusion of Kentucky streams in the National Wild and Scenic Rivers System. The office may enter into written cooperative agreements for joint federal-state or interstate administration of a Kentucky component of the National Wild and Scenic Rivers System, provided agreements for the administration of water and land uses are not less restrictive than those set forth in KRS 146.200 to 146.360.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 13; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9); 2010, ch. 24, § 130, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 117, § 8, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 29, § 18, effective July 14, 2018.

146.330.
Employment of assistants.

The office may employ such technical, clerical, stenographic, and other employees and assistants as are required to effectively carry out the duties and responsibilities as provided in KRS 146.200 to 146.360.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 14; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9); 2010, ch. 24, § 131, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 117, § 9, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 29, § 19, effective July 14, 2018.

146.340.
Wild Rivers System fund created.

A fund for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of KRS 146.200 to 146.360 is hereby created to be designated as a “Wild Rivers System fund” to consist of all revenues derived from privileges, concessions, contracts, or otherwise, all moneys received by gifts, contributions, donations, and grants from public or private sources. Such “Wild Rivers System fund” shall be disbursed by the office, after appropriations are made by law, for administration and other expenses and for other purposes provided by KRS 146.200 to 146.360.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 15; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(1); 2010, ch. 24, § 132, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 29, § 20, effective July 14, 2018.

146.350.
Enforcement.

It shall be the duty of the cabinet’s Office of Legal Services, or upon the secretary’s request, of the Attorney General, to bring an action for the recovery of the penalties provided for in KRS 146.990 and to bring an action for a restraining order, temporary or permanent injunction, for the prevention or correction of a condition constituting or threatening to constitute a violation of KRS 146.200 to 146.619. All actions for injunctive relief for violation of KRS 146.200 to 146.619 shall be brought in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky by the cabinet’s Office of Legal Services, or upon the secretary’s request, by the Attorney General in the Franklin Circuit Court. If the action seeks recovery of penalties in addition to injunctive relief, it shall be brought to one (1) of the counties through which the designated portion of the river runs.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 16; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(9); 1976, ch. 289, § 4; 1990, ch. 399, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 2018 ch. 29, § 21, effective July 14, 2018.

146.360.
Trespass.

Nothing in KRS 146.210 to 146.360 shall be construed to confer upon any member of the public any right to the use of or access to private lands within the boundary of a designated wild river.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 197, § 6 (1st sentence).